Maine, session 132, LD955.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §2436, sub-§2-D is enacted to read:
2-D. For a claim submitted by a health care provider or health care facility with respect
to a carrier as defined in section 4301‑A, subsection 3 on or after January 1, 2026, a carrier
may not deny a claim based solely on the use of artificial intelligence. For the purposes of
this subsection, "artificial intelligence" means a computerized system capable of making
decisions or recommendations based on algorithms and data analysis.
Sec. 2. 24-A MRSA §4304, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Use of artificial intelligence. Beginning January 1, 2026, a carrier may not make
medical review or utilization review determinations relating to the approval, denial or
adjustment of coverage for services under a health plan based solely on the use of artificial
intelligence. Before a carrier denies benefits or reduces payment for services using artificial
intelligence, the carrier shall conduct a utilization review done by a physician who is
licensed in this State, including a review of the medical necessity of the services, the
professional judgment of the enrollee's provider and the impact of any denial of benefits or
reduction in payment on the enrollee's health outcomes. An enrollee or provider has the
right to appeal any determination under this subsection in accordance with section 4303,
subsection 4. For the purposes of this subsection, "artificial intelligence" means a
computerized system capable of making decisions or recommendations based on
algorithms and data analysis.
Sec. 3. 24-A MRSA §4304, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Rulemaking. The bureau shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of
subsection 8 related to the use of artificial intelligence by a carrier. Rules adopted pursuant
to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter
2-A.
Sec. 4. 24-A MRSA §4304, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Reporting on use of artificial intelligence. Beginning April 15, 2026 and
quarterly thereafter, a carrier shall report to the bureau on the number of denials of coverage
under subsection 8, the outcome of the review conducted by a licensed physician in
accordance with subsection 8 and the number of appeals of a determination under
subsection 8 and the outcome of those appeals. Beginning February 1, 2027 and annually
thereafter, the bureau shall submit a report summarizing the quarterly reports from carriers
to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over health insurance
matters.
Sec. 5. Use of artificial intelligence by health insurance carriers;
rulemaking. No later than November 1, 2025, the Department of Professional and
Financial Regulation, Bureau of Insurance shall adopt rules relating to the use of artificial
intelligence as required by the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 24-A, section 4304, subsection
9.